Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-502.1 of Title 29, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Captive-bred alligator” means any alligator hatched from


eggs in captivity; and


2. “Native-bred alligator” means any alligator of a species


indigenous to this state that has been hatched from eggs in the


wild.





Req. No. 2614 Page 1


B. Except as otherwise provided by law, no permit shall be


required to possess a captive-bred alligator that has been verified


as captive-bred under the provisions of this section.


C. No person shall take or possess a native-bred alligator, or


the eggs of a native-bred alligator, for the purpose of declaring


the alligator as captive-bred, whether for private ownership, sale,


or transfer.


D. The Department of Wildlife Conservation shall promulgate


rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this


section.


E. Any person convicted of violating any provision of this


section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable by a fine not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor


more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment in the


county jail not to exceed thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2614 YG 1/15/2026 12:22:42 PM











Req. No. 2614 Page 2